Washington statutes.
RCW 18.300.110

Penalties for violation.

If, following a hearing, the director finds that any person or an applicant or licensee has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under it, the director may impose one or more of the following penalties:

(1) Denial of a license or renewal;

(2) Revocation or suspension of a license;

(3) A fine of not more than five hundred dollars per violation;

(4) Issuance of a reprimand or letter of censure;

(5) Placement of the licensee on probation for a fixed period of time;

(6) Restriction of the licensee's authorized scope of practice;

(7) Requiring the licensee to make restitution or a refund as determined by the director to any individual injured by the violation; or

(8) Requiring the licensee to obtain additional training or instruction.

[ 2009 c 412 s 12.]